Utah statutes.
30-1-17.1.   Annulment -- Grounds for.

A marriage may be annulled for any of the following causes existing at the time of the marriage:

(1)  When the marriage is prohibited or void under Title 30, Chapter 1.

(2)  Upon grounds existing at common law.

